District of Columbia statutes.
4-204.54

Purposes of the Fund.

The Fund shall be used for the following purposes:

(1)

Ensuring adequate resources are available to support District-wide Medicaid costs and revenue shortfalls;

(1A)

Ensuring adequate resources are available to support District-wide Medicare costs and revenue shortfalls;

(1B)

Ensuring adequate resources are available to support District-wide Foster Care and Adoption Assistance costs and revenue shortfalls;

(2)

Ensuring adequate resources are available to support District-wide Special Education costs and revenue shortfalls;

(3)

Supporting Medicaid, Medicare, and Foster Care and Adoption Assistance reform activities designed to establish cost-effective, agency-based Medicaid, Medicare, and Foster Care and Adoption Assistance operations; and

(4)

Optimizing Medicaid, Medicare, Foster Care and Adoption Assistance and other third-party revenues.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1554, 49 DCR 6968
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 1503(c), 50 DCR 5668
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 5142 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 5142 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1503(c) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1503(c) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
D.C. Law 15-39, in the introductory language, substituted “The Fund shall be used for the following purposes:” for “The purposes of the Fund shall include:”; added pars. (1A) and (1B); in par. (3), substituted “Medicaid, Medicare, and Foster Care and Adoption Assistance” for “Medicaid” in two places; and in par. (4), substituted “Medicaid, Medicare, Foster Care and Adoption Assistance” for “Medicaid”.
This section is referenced in § 4-204.53 and § 4-204.55.